Washington statutes.
RCW 18.92.125

Veterinary technicians or veterinary medication clerks.

No veterinarian who uses the services of a veterinary technician or veterinary medication clerk shall be considered as aiding and abetting any unlicensed person to practice veterinary medicine. A veterinarian retains professional and personal responsibility for any act which constitutes the practice of veterinary medicine as defined in this chapter when performed by a veterinary technician or veterinary medication clerk in his or her employ.

[ 2000 c 93 s 12; 1993 c 78 s 5; 1986 c 259 s 143; 1983 c 102 s 5; 1974 ex.s. c 44 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.